Utah statutes.
78B-8-303.   Recoverable rates.

If the rates charged by private process servers exceed the rates established by law for service of process by persons under Subsection 78B-8-302(1), the excess charge may be recovered as costs of an action only if the court determines the service and charge were justifiable under the circumstances.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

